Utah statutes.
77-10a-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Clerk of the court" means the state court administrator or his designee.

(2)  "Managing judge" means the supervising judge when he retains authority to manage a grand jury, or the district court judge to whom the supervising judge delegates management of a grand jury.

(3)  "Presiding officer" means the presiding officer of the Judicial Council.

(4)  "Subject" means a person whose conduct is within the scope of the grand jury's investigation, and that conduct exposes the person to possible criminal prosecution.

(5)  "Supervising judge" means the district court judge appointed by the presiding officer to supervise the five-judge grand jury panel.

(6)  "Target" means a person regarding whom the attorney for the state, the special prosecutor, or the grand jury has substantial evidence that links that person to the commission of a crime and who could be indicted or charged with that crime.

(7)  "Witness" means a person who appears before the grand jury either voluntarily or pursuant to subpoena for the purpose of providing testimony or evidence for the grand jury's use in discharging its responsibilities.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 1990 General Session

